Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5908.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) A violation of section 1 , 2, or 2a is a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years in prison or and a fine of not more than $10,000.00. , or both. (2) A violation of section 2 is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 10 years. (3) (2) A violation of section 3 is a felony, punishable by not more than 5 years in prison or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.